Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.250

Sales directed by will.

When property is directed by will to be sold, or authority is given in the will to sell property, the executor may sell any property of the estate without the order of the court, and without any notice, and it shall not be necessary under such circumstances to make any application to the court with reference to such sales or have the same confirmed by the court.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.250. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 146; RRS s 1516; prior: Code 1881 s 1527.]